Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.531

Business assistance account.

The business assistance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the expansion of business assistance services delivered by the small business development center created in RCW 28B.30.530. Only the administrator of the center or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2009 c 486 s 2.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Intent—2009 c 486: See notes following RCW 28B.30.530.